Missouri, session 2026, SB960.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 644.021, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 644.021,
to read as follows:
644.021. 1. There is hereby created a water
contaminant control agency to be known as the "Clean Water
Commission of the State of Missouri", whose domicile for the
purposes of sections 644.006 to 644.141 shall be deemed to
be that of the department of natural resources. The
commission shall consist of seven members appointed by the
governor with the advice and consent of the senate. No more
than four of the members shall belong to the same political
party. All members shall be representative of the general
interest of the public and shall have an interest in and
knowledge of conservation and the effects and control of
water contaminants. [At least two members shall be
knowledgeable concerning the needs of agriculture, industry
or mining and interested in protecting these needs] Each
member of the commission shall serve in a manner consistent
with the purposes of sections 644.006 to 644.141[. One
member shall be knowledgeable concerning the needs of
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 960 2
publicly owned wastewater treatment works. No more than
four members shall represent the public. No member shall
receive, or have received during the previous two years, a
significant portion of his or her income directly or
indirectly from permit holders or applicants for a permit
pursuant to any federal water pollution control act as
amended and as applicable to this state] and the commission
shall be comprised of the following members:
(1) One member knowledgeable concerning the needs of
agriculture;
(2) One member knowledgeable concerning the needs of
industry or mining;
(3) One member knowledgeable concerning the needs of
publicly owned wastewater treatment works; and
(4) Four members representing the public.
All members appointed on or after August 28, 2002, shall
have demonstrated an interest and knowledge about water
quality. All members appointed on or after August 28, 2002,
shall be qualified by interest, education, training or
experience to provide, assess and evaluate scientific and
technical information concerning water quality, financial
requirements and the effects of the promulgation of
standards, rules and regulations. At the first meeting of
the commission and [at yearly intervals] annually
thereafter, the members shall select from among themselves a
chairman and a vice chairman. The governor shall not
appoint any person who has a substantial interest, as
defined in section 105.450, in any business entity regulated
under this chapter or any business entity which would be
regulated under this chapter if located in the state. The
commission shall establish rules which specify when members

SB 960 3
shall exempt themselves from participating in discussions
and from voting on issues before the commission due to
potential conflict of interest. Prior to any vote on any
variance, appeal, or order, the commission shall adopt a
rule to exclude from such vote any member with a conflict of
interest. Any person may appeal the appointment of a member
on the grounds of conflict of interest. A member of the
commission has a conflict of interest when he or she is able
to utilize the commission to obtain a personal or
professional benefit outside the jurisdiction of the
commission. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is
defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective
only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The members' terms of office shall be four years
and until their successors are selected and qualified.
Provided, however, that the first three members appointed
shall serve a term of two years, the next three members
appointed shall serve a term of four years, thereafter all
members appointed shall serve a term of four years. There
is no limitation on the number of terms any appointed member
may serve. If a vacancy occurs the governor may appoint a
member for the remaining portion of the unexpired term
created by the vacancy. The governor may remove any

SB 960 4
appointed member for cause. The members of the commission
shall be reimbursed for travel and other expenses actually
and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
3. The commission shall hold at least four regular
meetings each year and such additional meetings as the
chairman deems desirable at a place and time to be fixed by
the chairman. Special meetings may be called by three
members of the commission upon delivery of written notice to
each member of the commission. Reasonable written notice of
all meetings shall be given by the director to all members
of the commission. Four members of the commission shall
constitute a quorum. All powers and duties conferred
specifically upon members of the commission shall be
exercised personally by the members and not by alternates or
representatives. All actions of the commission shall be
taken at meetings open to the public. Any member absent
from [six] four consecutive regular commission meetings for
any cause whatsoever shall be deemed to have resigned and
the vacancy shall be filled immediately in accordance with
100 subsection [1] 2 of this section.
✓